Nevada, session 83, SB227.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 385.007 is hereby amended to read as follows:
385.007 As used in this title, unless the context otherwise
requires:
1. “Challenge school” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 388D.305.
2. “Charter school” means a public school that is formed
pursuant to the provisions of chapter 388A of NRS.
3. “Department” means the Department of Education.
4. “English learner” has the meaning ascribed to it in 20 U.S.C.
§ 7801(20).
5. “Homeschooled child” means a child who receives
instruction at home and who is exempt from compulsory enrollment
and attendance pursuant to NRS 392.070.
6. “Local school precinct” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 388G.535.
7. “Public schools” means all kindergartens and elementary
schools, junior high schools and middle schools, high schools,
charter schools and any other schools, classes and educational
programs which receive their support through public taxation and,
except for charter schools, whose textbooks and courses of study are
under the control of the State Board.
8. “School bus” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 484A.230.
9. “School counselor” or “counselor” means a person who
holds a license issued pursuant to chapter 391 of NRS and an
endorsement to serve as a school counselor issued pursuant to
regulations adopted by the Commission on Professional Standards
in Education or who is otherwise authorized by the Superintendent
of Public Instruction to serve as a school counselor.
-
*SB227*

– 4 –
10. “School psychologist” or “psychologist” means a person
who holds a license issued pursuant to chapter 391 of NRS and an
endorsement to serve as a school psychologist issued pursuant to
regulations adopted by the Commission on Professional Standards
in Education , a license issued pursuant to section 2 of this act or
who is otherwise authorized by the Superintendent of Public
Instruction to serve as a school psychologist.
11. “School social worker” or “social worker” means a social
worker licensed pursuant to chapter 641B of NRS who holds a
license issued pursuant to chapter 391 of NRS and an endorsement
to serve as a school social worker issued pursuant to regulations
adopted by the Commission on Professional Standards in Education
or who is otherwise authorized by the Superintendent of Public
Instruction to serve as a school social worker.
12. “State Board” means the State Board of Education.
13. “University school for profoundly gifted pupils” has the
meaning ascribed to it in NRS 388C.040.
Sec. 2. Chapter 391 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
The School Psychologist Interstate Licensure Compact is
hereby ratified, enacted into law and entered into with all other
jurisdictions legally joining the Compact, in substantially the form
set forth in this section:

SECTION 1. PURPOSE

The purpose of this Compact is to facilitate the interstate
practice of School Psychology in educational or school settings,
and in so doing to improve the availability of School Psychological
Services to the public. This Compact is intended to establish a
pathway to allow School Psychologists to obtain equivalent
licenses to provide School Psychological Services in any Member
State. In this way, this Compact shall enable the Member States to
ensure that safe and effective School Psychological Services are
available and delivered by appropriately qualified professionals in
their educational settings.
To facilitate the objectives described above, this Compact:
A. Enables School Psychologists who qualify for receipt of an
Equivalent License to practice in other Member States without
first satisfying burdensome and duplicative requirements;
B. Promotes the mobility of School Psychologists between
and among the Member States in order to address workforce
shortages and to ensure that safe and reliable School
Psychological Services are available in each Member State;
-
*SB227*

– 5 –
C. Enhances the public accessibility of School Psychological
Services by increasing the availability of qualified, licensed School
Psychologists through the establishment of an efficient and
streamlined pathway for Licensees to practice in other Member
States;
D. Preserves and respects the authority of each Member State
to protect the health and safety of its residents by ensuring that
only qualified, licensed professionals are authorized to provide
School Psychological Services within that State;
E. Requires School Psychologists practicing within a Member
State to comply with the Scope of Practice laws present in the State
where the School Psychological Services are being provided;
F. Promotes cooperation between the Member States in
regulating the practice of School Psychology within those States;
and
G. Facilitates the relocation of military members and their
spouses who are licensed to provide School Psychological
Services.

SECTION 2. DEFINITIONS

A. “Active Military Member” means any person with full-
time duty status in the armed forces of the United States, including
members of the National Guard and Reserve.
B. “Adverse Action” means disciplinary action or
encumbrance imposed on a License by a State Licensing
Authority.
C. “Alternative Program” means a non-disciplinary,
prosecutorial diversion, monitoring, or practice remediation
process entered into in lieu of an Adverse Action which is
applicable to a School Psychologist and approved by the State
Licensing Authority of a Member State in which the participating
School Psychologist is licensed. This includes, but is not limited to,
programs to which Licensees with substance abuse or addiction
issues may be referred in lieu of an Adverse Action.
D. “Commissioner” means the individual appointed by a
Member State to serve as the representative to the Commission for
that Member State.
E. “Compact” means this School Psychologist Interstate
Licensure Compact.
F. “Continuing Professional Education” means a
requirement, imposed by a Member State as a condition of License
renewal to provide evidence of successful participation in
professional educational activities relevant to the provision of
School Psychological Services.
-
*SB227*

– 6 –
G. “Criminal Background Check” means the submission of
fingerprints or other biometric information for a License applicant
for the purpose of obtaining that applicant’s criminal history
record information, as defined in 28 C.F.R. § 20.3(d), and the
State’s criminal history record repository as defined in 28 C.F.R. §
20.3(f).
H. “Doctoral Level Degree” means a graduate degree
program that consists of at least 90 graduate semester hours in the
field of School Psychology including a supervised internship.
I. “Encumbered License” means a License that a State
Licensing Authority has limited in any way other than through an
Alternative Program, including temporary or provisional licenses.
J. “Executive Committee” means the Commission’s Chair,
Vice Chair, Secretary and Treasurer and any other
Commissioners as may be determined by Commission Rule or
bylaw.
K. “Equivalent License” means a license to practice School
Psychology which a Member State has identified as a license
which may be provided to School Psychologists from other
Member States pursuant to this Compact.
L. “Home State” means the Member State that issued the
Home State License to the Licensee and is the Licensee’s primary
state of practice.
M. “Home State License” means the License that is not an
Encumbered License issued by the Home State to provide School
Psychological Services.
N. “License” means a current license, certification, or other
authorization granted by a Member State’s Licensing Authority
that permits an individual to provide School Psychological
Services.
O. “Licensee” means an individual who holds a License from
a Member State to provide School Psychological Services.
P. “Member State” means a State that has enacted the
Compact and been admitted to the Commission in accordance with
the provisions herein and Commission Rules.
Q. “Model Compact” means the model language for the
School Psychologist Interstate Licensure Compact on file with
the Council of State Governments or other entity as designated by
the Commission.
R. “Practice of School Psychology” means the delivery of
School Psychological Services.
S. “Qualifying National Exam” means a national licensing
examination endorsed by the National Association of School
Psychologists and any other exam as approved by the Rules of the
Commission.
-
*SB227*

– 7 –
T. “Qualifying School Psychologist Education Program”
means an education program which awards a Specialist-Level or
Doctoral-Level degree or equivalent upon completion and is
approved by the Rules of the Commission as meeting the necessary
minimum educational standards to ensure that its graduates are
ready, qualified, and able to engage in the Practice of School
Psychology.
U. “Remote State” means a Member State other than the
Home State where a Licensee holds a License through the
Compact.
V. “Rule” means a regulation promulgated by an entity,
including, but not limited to, the Commission and the State
Licensing Authority of each Member State, that has the force of
law.
W. “School Psychological Services” means academic, mental
and behavioral health services including assessment, prevention,
consultation and collaboration, intervention, and evaluation
provided by a School Psychologist in a school, as outlined in
applicable professional standards as determined by Commission
Rule.
X. “School Psychologist” means an individual who has met
the requirements to obtain a Home State License that legally
conveys the professional title of School Psychologist, or its
equivalent as determined by the Rules of the Commission.
Y. “School Psychologist Interstate Licensure Compact
Commission” or “Commission” means the joint government
agency established by this Compact whose membership consists of
representatives from each Member State that has enacted the
Compact, and as further described in Section 7.
Z. “Scope of Practice” means the procedures, actions, and
processes a School Psychologist licensed in a State is permitted to
undertake in that State and the circumstances under which that
Licensee is permitted to undertake those procedures, actions, and
processes. Such procedures, actions, and processes, and the
circumstances under which they may be undertaken, may be
established through means including, but not limited to, statute,
regulations, case law, and other processes available to the State
Licensing Authority or other government agency.
AA. “Specialist-Level Degree” means a degree program that
requires at least 60 graduate semester hours or equivalent in the
field of School Psychology including a supervised internship.
BB. “State” means any state, commonwealth, district, or
territory of the United States of America.
-
*SB227*

– 8 –
CC. “State Licensing Authority” means a Member State’s
regulatory body responsible for issuing Licenses or otherwise
overseeing the Practice of School Psychology.
DD. “State Specific Requirement” means a requirement for
licensure covered in coursework or examination that includes
content of unique interest to the State.
EE. “Unencumbered License” means a License that
authorizes a Licensee to engage in the full and unrestricted
Practice of School Psychology.

SECTION 3. STATE PARTICIPATION IN THE COMPACT

A. To be eligible to join this Compact, and to maintain
eligibility as a Member State, a State must:
1. Enact a compact statute that is not materially different
from the Model Compact as defined in the Commission’s Rules;
2. Participate in the sharing of information with other
Member States as reasonably necessary to accomplish the
objectives of this Compact, and as further defined in Section 8;
3. Identify and maintain with the Commission a list of
Equivalent Licenses available to Licensees who hold a Home State
License under this Compact;
4. Have a mechanism in place for receiving and
investigating complaints about Licensees;
5. Notify the Commission, in compliance with the terms of
the Compact and the Commission’s Rules, of any Adverse Action
taken against a Licensee, or of the availability of investigative
information which relates to a Licensee or applicant for licensure;
6. Require that applicants for a Home State License have:
a. Taken and passed a Qualifying National Exam as
defined by the Rules of the Commission;
b. Completed a minimum of 1,200 hours of supervised
internship, of which at least 600 must have been completed in a
School, prior to being approved for licensure; and
c. Graduated from a Qualifying School Psychologist
Education Program; and
7. Comply with the terms of this Compact and the Rules of
the Commission.
B. Each Member State shall grant an Equivalent License to
practice School Psychology in that state upon application by a
Licensee who satisfies the criteria of Section 4.A. Each Member
State shall grant renewal of the Equivalent License to a Licensee
who satisfies the criteria of Section 4.B.
C. Member States may set and collect a fee for granting an
Equivalent License.
-
*SB227*

– 9 –
SECTION 4. SCHOOL PSYCHOLOGIST
PARTICIPATION IN THE COMPACT

A. To obtain and maintain an Equivalent License from a
Remote State under this Compact, a Licensee must:
1. Hold and maintain an active Home State License;
2. Satisfy any applicable State Specific Requirements
established by the Member State after an Equivalent License is
granted;
3. Complete any administrative or application requirements
which the Commission may establish by Rule, and pay any
associated fees;
4. Complete any requirements for renewal in the Home
State, including applicable Continuing Professional Education
requirements; and
5. Upon their application to receive a license under this
Compact, undergo a criminal background check in the Member
State in which the Equivalent License is sought in accordance
with the laws and regulations of such Member State.
B. To renew an Equivalent License in a Member State other
than the Home State, a Licensee must only apply for renewal,
complete a background check, and pay renewal fees as determined
by the Licensing Authority.

SECTION 5. ACTIVE MILITARY MEMBERS
OR THEIR SPOUSES

A Licensee who is an Active Military Member or is the spouse
of an Active Military Member shall be deemed to hold a Home
State License in any of the following locations:
A. The Licensee’s permanent residence;
B. A Member State that is the Licensee’s primary State of
Practice; or
C. A Member State where the Licensee has relocated
pursuant to a Permanent Change of Station (PCS).

SECTION 6. DISCIPLINE/ADVERSE ACTIONS

A. Nothing in this Compact shall be deemed or construed to
limit the authority of a Member State to investigate or impose
disciplinary measures on Licensees according to the State Practice
Laws thereof.
B. Member States shall be authorized to receive, and shall
provide, files and information regarding the investigation and
discipline, if any, of Licensees in other Member States upon
-
*SB227*

– 10 –
request. Any Member State receiving such information or files
shall protect and maintain the security and confidentiality thereof,
in at least the same manner that it maintains its own investigatory
or disciplinary files and information. Prior to disclosing any
disciplinary or investigatory information received from another
Member State, the disclosing state shall communicate its intention
and purpose for such disclosure to the Member State which
originally provided that information.

SECTION 7. ESTABLISHMENT OF THE
SCHOOL PSYCHOLOGIST INTERSTATE
LICENSURE COMPACT COMMISSION

A. The Member States hereby create and establish a joint
government agency whose membership consists of all Member
States that have enacted the Compact, and this agency shall be
known as the School Psychologist Interstate Licensure Compact
Commission. The Commission is an instrumentality of the
Member States acting jointly and not an instrumentality of any
one state. The Commission shall come into existence on or after
the effective date of the Compact as set forth in Section 11.
B. Membership, Voting, and Meetings
1. Each Member State shall have and be limited to one (1)
delegate selected by that Member State’s State Licensing
Authority.
2. The delegate shall be the primary administrative officer
of the Member State Licensing Authority or their designee who is
an employee of the Member State Licensing Authority.
3. The Commission shall by Rule or bylaw establish a term
of office for delegates and may by Rule or bylaw establish term
limits.
4. The Commission may recommend removal or suspension
of any delegate from office.
5. A Member State’s Licensing Authority shall fill any
vacancy of its delegate occurring on the Commission within 60
days of the vacancy.
6. Each delegate shall be entitled to one vote on all matters
before the Commission requiring a vote by Commission delegates.
7. A delegate shall vote in person or by such other means as
provided in the bylaws. The bylaws may provide for delegates to
meet by telecommunication, videoconference, or other means of
communication.
8. The Commission shall meet at least once during each
calendar year. Additional meetings may be held as set forth in the
-
*SB227*

– 11 –
bylaws. The Commission may meet by telecommunication, video
conference or other similar electronic means.
C. The Commission shall have the power to:
1. Establish the fiscal year of the Commission;
2. Establish code of conduct and conflict of interest
policies;
3. Establish and amend Rules and bylaws;
4. Establish the procedure through which a Licensee may
change their Home State;
5. Maintain its financial records in accordance with the
bylaws;
6. Meet and take such actions as are consistent with the
provisions of this Compact, the Commission’s Rules, and the
bylaws;
7. Initiate and conclude legal proceedings or actions in the
name of the Commission, provided that the standing of any
Member State Licensing Authority to sue or be sued under
applicable law shall not be affected;
8. Maintain and certify records and information provided to
a Member State as the authenticated business records of the
Commission, and designate an agent to do so on the Commission’s
behalf;
9. Purchase and maintain insurance and bonds;
10. Borrow, accept, or contract for services of personnel,
including, but not limited to, employees of a Member State;
11. Conduct an annual financial review;
12. Hire employees, elect or appoint officers, fix
compensation, define duties, grant such individuals appropriate
authority to carry out the purposes of the Compact, and establish
the Commission’s personnel policies and programs relating to
conflicts of interest, qualifications of personnel, and other related
personnel matters;
13. Assess and collect fees;
14. Accept any and all appropriate gifts, donations, grants
of money, other sources of revenue, equipment, supplies,
materials, and services, and receive, utilize, and dispose of the
same, provided that, at all times, the Commission shall avoid any
appearance of impropriety or conflict of interest;
15. Lease, purchase, retain, own, hold, improve, or use any
property, real, personal, or mixed, or any undivided interest
therein;
16. Sell, convey, mortgage, pledge, lease, exchange,
abandon, or otherwise dispose of any property real, personal, or
mixed;
17. Establish a budget and make expenditures;
-
*SB227*

– 12 –
18. Borrow money;
19. Appoint committees, including standing committees,
composed of members, State regulators, State legislators or their
representatives, and consumer representatives, and such other
interested persons as may be designated in this Compact and the
bylaws;
20. Provide and receive information from, and cooperate
with, law enforcement agencies;
21. Establish and elect an Executive Committee, including
a chair and a vice chair;
22. Determine whether a State’s adopted language is
materially different from the Model Compact language such that
the State would not qualify for participation in the Compact; and
23. Perform such other functions as may be necessary or
appropriate to achieve the purposes of this Compact.
D. The Executive Committee
1. The Executive Committee shall have the power to act on
behalf of the Commission according to the terms of this Compact.
The powers, duties, and responsibilities of the Executive
Committee shall include:
a. Overseeing the day-to-day activities of the
administration of the Compact, including enforcement and
compliance with the provisions of the Compact, its Rules and
bylaws, and other such duties as deemed necessary;
b. Recommending to the Commission changes to the
Rules or bylaws, changes to this Compact legislation, fees charged
to Member States, fees charged to Licensees, and other fees;
c. Ensuring Compact administration services are
appropriately provided, including by contract;
d. Preparing and recommending the budget;
e. Maintaining financial records on behalf of the
Commission;
f. Monitoring Compact compliance of Member States
and providing compliance reports to the Commission;
g. Establishing additional committees as necessary;
h. Exercising the powers and duties of the Commission
during the interim between Commission meetings, except for
adopting or amending Rules, adopting or amending bylaws, and
exercising any other powers and duties expressly reserved to the
Commission by Rule or bylaw; and
i. Other duties as provided in the Rules or bylaws of the
Commission.
2. The Executive Committee shall be composed of up to 7
members:
-
*SB227*

– 13 –
a. The chair and vice chair of the Commission shall be
voting members of the Executive Committee; and
b. The Commission shall elect 5 voting members from
the current membership of the Commission.
3. The Commission may remove any member of the
Executive Committee as provided in the Commission’s bylaws.
4. The Executive Committee shall meet at least annually.
a. Executive Committee meetings shall be open to the
public, except that the Executive Committee may meet in a closed,
non-public meeting as provided in subsection F.2 below.
b. The Executive Committee shall give 30 days’ notice of
its meetings, posted on its website and as determined to provide
notice to persons with an interest in the business of the
Commission.
c. The Executive Committee may hold a special meeting
in accordance with subsection F.1.b. below.
E. The Commission shall adopt and provide to the Member
States an annual report.
F. Meetings of the Commission
1. All meetings shall be open to the public, except that the
Commission may meet in a closed, non-public meeting as provided
in subsection F.2 below.
a. Public notice for all meetings of the full Commission
of meetings shall be given in the same manner as required under
the Rulemaking provisions in Section 9, except that the
Commission may hold a special meeting as provided in subsection
F.1.b below.
b. The Commission may hold a special meeting when it
must meet to conduct emergency business by giving 48 hours’
notice to all commissioners, on the Commission’s website, and
other means as provided in the Commission’s rules. The
Commission’s legal counsel shall certify that the Commission’s
need to meet qualifies as an emergency.
2. The Commission or the Executive Committee or other
committees of the Commission may convene in a closed, non-
public meeting for the Commission or Executive Committee or
other committees of the Commission to receive legal advice or to
discuss:
a. Non-compliance of a Member State with its
obligations under the Compact;
b. The employment, compensation, discipline or other
matters, practices or procedures related to specific employees;
c. Current or threatened discipline of a Licensee by the
Commission or by a Member State’s Licensing Authority;
-
*SB227*

– 14 –
d. Current, threatened, or reasonably anticipated
litigation;
e. Negotiation of contracts for the purchase, lease, or
sale of goods, services, or real estate;
f. Accusing any person of a crime or formally censuring
any person;
g. Trade secrets or commercial or financial information
that is privileged or confidential;
h. Information of a personal nature where disclosure
would constitute a clearly unwarranted invasion of personal
privacy;
i. Investigative records compiled for law enforcement
purposes;
j. Information related to any investigative reports
prepared by or on behalf of or for use of the Commission or other
committee charged with responsibility of investigation or
determination of compliance issues pursuant to the Compact;
k. Matters specifically exempted from disclosure by
federal or Member State law; or
l. Other matters as promulgated by the Commission by
Rule.
3. If a meeting, or portion of a meeting, is closed, the
presiding officer shall state that the meeting will be closed and
reference each relevant exempting provision, and such reference
shall be recorded in the minutes.
4. The Commission shall keep minutes that fully and
clearly describe all matters discussed in a meeting and shall
provide a full and accurate summary of actions taken, and the
reasons therefore, including a description of the views expressed.
All documents considered in connection with an action shall be
identified in such minutes. All minutes and documents of a closed
meeting shall remain under seal, subject to release only by a
majority vote of the Commission or order of a court of competent
jurisdiction.
G. Financing of the Commission
1. The Commission shall pay, or provide for the payment
of, the reasonable expenses of its establishment, organization, and
ongoing activities.
2. The Commission may accept any and all appropriate
revenue sources as provided in C(14).
3. The Commission may levy on and collect an annual
assessment from each Member State and impose fees on Licensees
practicing in the Member States under an Equivalent License to
cover the cost of the operations and activities of the Commission
and its staff, which must be in a total amount sufficient to cover its
-
*SB227*

– 15 –
annual budget as approved each year for which revenue is not
provided by other sources. The aggregate annual assessment
amount for Member States shall be allocated based upon a
formula that the Commission shall promulgate by Rule.
4. The Commission shall not incur obligations of any kind
prior to securing the funds adequate to meet the same and shall
not pledge the credit of any of the Member States, except by and
with the authority of the Member State.
5. The Commission shall keep accurate accounts of all
receipts and disbursements. The receipts and disbursements of the
Commission shall be subject to the financial review and
accounting procedures established under its bylaws. However, all
receipts and disbursements of funds handled by the Commission
shall be subject to an annual financial review by a certified or
licensed public accountant, and the report of the financial review
shall be included in and become part of the annual report of the
Commission.
H. Qualified Immunity, Defense, and Indemnification
1. The members, officers, executive director, employees and
representatives of the Commission shall be immune from suit and
liability, both personally and in their official capacity, for any
claim for damage to or loss of property or personal injury or other
civil liability caused by or arising out of any actual or alleged act,
error, or omission that occurred, or that the person against whom
the claim is made had a reasonable basis for believing occurred
within the scope of Commission employment, duties or
responsibilities, provided that nothing in this paragraph shall be
construed to protect any such person from suit or liability for any
damage, loss, injury, or liability caused by the intentional or
willful or wanton misconduct of that person. The procurement of
insurance of any type by the Commission shall not in any way
compromise or limit the immunity granted hereunder.
2. The Commission shall defend any member, officer,
executive director, employee, and representative of the
Commission in any civil action seeking to impose liability arising
out of any actual or alleged act, error, or omission that occurred
within the scope of Commission employment, duties, or
responsibilities, or as determined by the Commission that the
person against whom the claim is made had a reasonable basis for
believing occurred within the scope of Commission employment,
duties, or responsibilities, provided that nothing herein shall be
construed to prohibit that person from retaining their own counsel
at their own expense and that the actual or alleged act, error, or
omission did not result from that person’s intentional or willful or
wanton misconduct.
-
*SB227*

– 16 –
3. The Commission shall indemnify and hold harmless any
member, officer, executive director, employee, and representative
of the Commission for the amount of any settlement or judgment
obtained against that person arising out of any actual or alleged
act, error, or omission that occurred within the scope of
Commission employment, duties, or responsibilities, or that such
person had a reasonable basis for believing occurred within the
scope of Commission employment, duties, or responsibilities,
provided that the actual or alleged act, error, or omission did not
result from the intentional or willful or wanton misconduct of that
person.
4. Nothing herein shall be construed as a limitation on the
liability of any licensee for professional malpractice or
misconduct, which shall be governed solely by any other
applicable state laws.
5. Nothing in this Compact shall be interpreted to waive or
otherwise abrogate a Member State’s state action immunity or
state action affirmative defense with respect to antitrust claims
under the Sherman Act, Clayton Act, or any other state or federal
antitrust or anticompetitive law or regulation.
6. Nothing in this Compact shall be construed to be a
waiver of sovereign immunity by the Member States or by the
Commission.

SECTION 8. FACILITATING INFORMATION EXCHANGE

A. The Commission shall provide for facilitating the
exchange of information to administer and implement the
provisions of this Compact in accordance with the Rules of
the Commission, consistent with generally accepted data
protection principles.
B. Notwithstanding any other provision of State law to the
contrary, a Member State shall agree to provide for the facilitation
of the following Licensee information as required by the Rules of
the Commission, including:
1. Identifying information;
2. Licensure data;
3. Adverse Actions against a License and information
related thereto;
4. Non-confidential information related to Alternative
Program participation, the beginning and ending dates of such
participation, and other information related to such participation
not made confidential under Member State law;
5. Any denial of application for licensure, and the reason(s)
for such denial;
-
*SB227*

– 17 –
6. The presence of investigative information; and
7. Other information that may facilitate the administration
of this Compact or the protection of the public, as determined by
the Rules of the Commission.
C. Nothing in this Compact shall be deemed or construed to
alter, limit, or inhibit the power of a Member State to control and
maintain ownership of its Licensee information or alter, limit, or
inhibit the laws or regulations governing Licensee information in
the Member State.

SECTION 9. RULEMAKING

A. The Commission shall exercise its Rulemaking powers
pursuant to the criteria set forth in this interstate Compact and the
Rules adopted thereunder. Rules and amendments shall become
binding as of the date specified in each Rule or amendment.
B. The Commission shall promulgate reasonable Rules to
achieve the intent and purpose of this interstate Compact. In the
event the Commission exercises its Rulemaking authority in a
manner that is beyond the purpose and intent of this interstate
Compact, or the powers granted hereunder, then such an action by
the Commission shall be invalid and have no force and effect of
law in the Member States.
C. If a majority of the legislatures of the Member States
rejects a Rule, by enactment of a statute or resolution in the same
manner used to adopt the Compact within four (4) years of the
date of adoption of the Rule, then such Rule shall have no further
force and effect in any Member State.
D. Rules or amendments to the Rules shall be adopted or
ratified at a regular or special meeting of the Commission in
accordance with Commission Rules and Bylaws.
E. Prior to promulgation and adoption of a final Rule or
Rules by the Commission, and at least thirty (30) days in advance
of the meeting at which the Rule will be considered and voted
upon, the Commission shall file a notice of proposed rulemaking:
1. On the website of the Commission or other publicly
accessible platform; and
2. On the website of each Member State Licensing
Authority or other publicly accessible platform or the publication
in which each State would otherwise publish proposed Rules.
F. Upon determination that an emergency exists, the
Commission may consider and adopt an emergency Rule with 48
hours’ notice, with opportunity to comment, provided that the
usual Rulemaking procedures shall be retroactively applied to the
Rule as soon as reasonably possible, in no event later than ninety
-
*SB227*

– 18 –
(90) days after the effective date of the Rule. For the purposes of
this provision, an emergency Rule is one that must be adopted
immediately in order to:
1. Meet an imminent threat to public health, safety, or
welfare;
2. Prevent a loss of Commission or Member State funds;
3. Meet a deadline for the promulgation of an
administrative Rule that is established by federal law or Rule; or
4. Protect public health and safety.

SECTION 10. OVERSIGHT, DISPUTE RESOLUTION,
AND ENFORCEMENT

A. Oversight
1. The executive and judicial branches of the State
government in each Member State shall enforce this Compact and
take all actions necessary and appropriate to implement the
Compact.
2. Venue is proper and judicial proceedings by or against
the Commission shall be brought solely and exclusively in a court
of competent jurisdiction where the principal office of the
Commission is located. The Commission may waive venue and
jurisdictional defenses to the extent it adopts or consents to
participate in alternative dispute resolution proceedings. Nothing
herein shall affect or limit the selection or propriety of venue in
any action against a licensee for professional malpractice,
misconduct or any such similar matter.
3. The Commission shall be entitled to receive service of
process in any proceeding regarding the enforcement or
interpretation of the Compact and shall have standing to intervene
in such a proceeding for all purposes. Failure to provide the
Commission service of process shall render a judgment or order
void as to the Commission, this Compact, or promulgated Rules.
B. Default, Technical Assistance, and Termination
1. If the Commission determines that a Member State has
defaulted in the performance of its obligations or responsibilities
under this Compact or the promulgated Rules, the Commission
shall provide written notice to the defaulting State. The notice of
default shall describe the default, the proposed means of curing
the default, and any other action that the Commission may take,
and shall offer training and specific technical assistance
regarding the default.
2. The Commission shall provide a copy of the notice of
default to the other Member States.
-
*SB227*

– 19 –
C. If a State in default fails to cure the default, the defaulting
State may be terminated from the Compact upon an affirmative
vote of a supermajority of the delegates of the Member States, and
all rights, privileges and benefits conferred on that state by this
Compact may be terminated on the effective date of termination. A
cure of the default does not relieve the offending State of
obligations or liabilities incurred during the period of default.
D. Termination of membership in the Compact shall be
imposed only after all other means of securing compliance have
been exhausted. Notice of intent to suspend or terminate shall be
given by the Commission to the governor, the majority and
minority leaders of the defaulting State’s legislature, the
defaulting State’s Licensing Authority and each of the Member
States’ Licensing Authorities.
E. A State that has been terminated is responsible for all
assessments, obligations, and liabilities incurred through the
effective date of termination, including obligations that extend
beyond the effective date of termination.
F. Upon the termination of a State’s membership from this
Compact, that State shall immediately provide notice to all
Licensees within that State of such termination. The terminated
State shall continue to recognize all Licenses granted pursuant to
this Compact for a minimum of six (6) months after the date of
said notice of termination.
G. The Commission shall not bear any costs related to a State
that is found to be in default or that has been terminated from the
Compact, unless agreed upon in writing between the Commission
and the defaulting State.
H. The defaulting State may appeal the action of the
Commission by petitioning the U.S. District Court for the District
of Columbia or the federal district where the Commission has its
principal offices. The prevailing party shall be awarded all costs of
such litigation, including reasonable attorney’s fees.
I. Dispute Resolution
1. Upon request by a Member State, the Commission shall
attempt to resolve disputes related to the Compact that arise
among Member States and between Member and non-Member
States.
2. The Commission shall promulgate a Rule providing for
both mediation and binding dispute resolution for disputes as
appropriate.
J. Enforcement
1. By majority vote as provided by Rule, the Commission
may initiate legal action against a Member State in default in the
United States District Court for the District of Columbia or the
-
*SB227*

– 20 –
federal district where the Commission has its principal offices to
enforce compliance with the provisions of the Compact and its
promulgated Rules. The relief sought may include both injunctive
relief and damages. In the event judicial enforcement is necessary,
the prevailing party shall be awarded all costs of such litigation,
including reasonable attorney’s fees. The remedies herein shall
not be the exclusive remedies of the Commission. The Commission
may pursue any other remedies available under federal law or the
defaulting Member State’s law.
2. A Member State may initiate legal action against the
Commission in the U.S. District Court for the District of Columbia
or the federal district where the Commission has its principal
offices to enforce compliance with the provisions of the Compact
and its promulgated Rules. The relief sought may include both
injunctive relief and damages. In the event judicial enforcement is
necessary, the prevailing party shall be awarded all costs of such
litigation, including reasonable attorney’s fees.
3. No person other than a Member State shall enforce this
Compact against the Commission.

SECTION 11. EFFECTIVE DATE, WITHDRAWAL,
AND AMENDMENT

A. The Compact shall come into effect on the date on which
the Compact statute is enacted into law in the seventh Member
State.
1. On or after the effective date of the Compact indicated
above, the Commission shall convene and review the enactment of
each of the Charter Member States to determine if the statute
enacted by each such Charter Member State is materially different
than the Model Compact statute.
a. A Charter Member State whose enactment is found to
be materially different from the Model Compact statute shall be
entitled to the default process set forth in Section 10.
b. If any Member State is later found to be in default, or
is terminated or withdraws from the Compact, the Commission
shall remain in existence and the Compact shall remain in effect
even if the number of Member States should be less than seven.
2. Member States enacting the Compact subsequent to the
Charter Member States shall be subject to the process set forth in
Section 7(C)(22) to determine if their enactments are materially
different from the Model Compact statute and whether they
qualify for participation in the Compact.
3. All actions taken for the benefit of the Commission or in
furtherance of the purposes of the administration of the Compact
-
*SB227*

– 21 –
prior to the effective date of the Compact or the Commission
coming into existence shall be considered to be actions of the
Commission unless specifically repudiated by the Commission.
a. Any State that joins the Compact subsequent to the
Commission’s initial adoption of the Rules and bylaws shall be
subject to the Rules and bylaws as they exist on the date on which
the Compact becomes law in that State. Any Rule that has been
previously adopted by the Commission shall have the full force
and effect of law on the day the Compact becomes law in that
State.
b. Any Member State may withdraw from this Compact
by enacting a statute repealing the same.
B. A Member State’s withdrawal shall not take effect until
180 days after enactment of the repealing statute.
C. Withdrawal shall not affect the continuing requirement of
the withdrawing State’s Licensing Authority to comply with the
investigative and Adverse Action reporting requirements of this
Compact prior to the effective date of withdrawal.
D. Upon the enactment of a statute withdrawing from this
Compact, a State shall immediately provide notice of such
withdrawal to all Licensees within that State. Notwithstanding any
subsequent statutory enactment to the contrary, such withdrawing
State shall continue to recognize all licenses granted pursuant to
this Compact for a minimum of six (6) months after the date of
such notice of withdrawal.
1. Nothing contained in this Compact shall be construed to
invalidate or prevent any licensure agreement or other cooperative
arrangement between a Member State and a non-Member State
that does not conflict with the provisions of this Compact.
2. This Compact may be amended by the Member States.
No amendment to this Compact shall become effective and
binding upon any Member State until it is enacted into the laws of
all Member States.

SECTION 12. CONSTRUCTION AND SEVERABILITY

A. This Compact and the Commission’s rulemaking authority
shall be liberally construed so as to effectuate the purposes, and
the implementation and administration of the Compact. Provisions
of the Compact expressly authorizing or requiring the
promulgation of Rules shall not be construed to limit the
Commission’s rulemaking authority solely for those purposes.
B. The provisions of this Compact shall be severable and if
any phrase, clause, sentence or provision of this Compact is held
by a court of competent jurisdiction to be contrary to the
-
*SB227*

– 22 –
constitution of any Member State, a State seeking participation in
the Compact, or of the United States, or the applicability thereof to
any government, agency, person or circumstance is held to be
unconstitutional by a court of competent jurisdiction, the validity
of the remainder of this Compact and the applicability thereof to
any other government, agency, person or circumstance shall not
be affected thereby.
C. Notwithstanding subsection B of this Section, the
Commission may deny a State’s participation in the Compact or,
in accordance with the requirements of Section 10.B, terminate a
Member State’s participation in the Compact, if it determines that
a constitutional requirement of a Member State is a material
departure from the Compact. Otherwise, if this Compact shall be
held to be contrary to the constitution of any Member State, the
Compact shall remain in full force and effect as to the remaining
Member States and in full force and effect as to the Member State
affected as to all severable matters.

SECTION 13. CONSISTENT EFFECT AND
CONFLICT WITH OTHER STATE LAWS

A. Nothing herein shall prevent or inhibit the enforcement of
any other law of a Member State that is not inconsistent with the
Compact.
B. Any laws, statutes, regulations, or other legal requirements
in a Member State in conflict with the Compact are superseded to
the extent of the conflict.
C. All permissible agreements between the Commission and
the Member States are binding in accordance with their terms.
Sec. 3. NRS 391.019 is hereby amended to read as follows:
391.019 1. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 391.027,
the Commission shall adopt regulations:
(a) Prescribing the qualifications for licensing teachers and other
educational personnel and the procedures for the issuance and
renewal of those licenses. The regulations:
(1) Must include, without limitation, the qualifications for
licensing teachers and administrators pursuant to an alternative route
to licensure which provides that the required education and training
may be provided by any qualified provider which has been approved
by the Commission, including, without limitation, institutions of
higher education and other providers that operate independently of
an institution of higher education. The regulations adopted pursuant
to this subparagraph must:
(I) Establish the requirements for approval as a qualified
provider;
-
*SB227*

– 23 –
(II) Require a qualified provider to be selective in its
acceptance of students;
(III) Require a qualified provider to provide in-person or
virtual supervised, school-based experiences and ongoing support
for its students, such as mentoring and coaching;
(IV) Significantly limit the amount of course work
required or provide for the waiver of required course work for
students who achieve certain scores on tests;
(V) Allow for the completion in 2 years or less of the
education and training required under the alternative route to
licensure;
(VI) Provide that a person who has completed the
education and training required under the alternative route to
licensure and who has satisfied all other requirements for licensure
may apply for a regular license pursuant to sub-subparagraph (VII)
regardless of whether the person has received an offer of
employment from a school district, charter school or private school;
and
(VII) Upon the completion by a person of the education
and training required under the alternative route to licensure and the
satisfaction of all other requirements for licensure, provide for the
issuance of a regular license to the person pursuant to the provisions
of this chapter and the regulations adopted pursuant to this chapter.
(2) Must require an applicant for a license to teach middle
school or junior high school education or secondary education to
demonstrate proficiency in a field of specialization or area of
concentration by successfully completing course work prescribed by
the Department or completing a subject matter competency
examination prescribed by the Department with a score deemed
satisfactory.
(3) Must not prescribe qualifications which are more
stringent than the qualifications set forth in NRS 391.0315 for a
licensed teacher who applies for an additional license in accordance
with that section.
(b) Identifying fields of specialization in teaching which require
the specialized training of teachers.
(c) Except as otherwise provided in NRS 391.125, requiring
teachers to obtain from the Department an endorsement in a field of
specialization to be eligible to teach in that field of specialization.
(d) Setting forth the educational requirements a teacher must
satisfy to qualify for an endorsement in each field of specialization.
(e) Setting forth the qualifications and requirements for
obtaining a license or endorsement to teach American Sign
Language, including, without limitation, being registered with the
Aging and Disability Services Division of the Department of Health
-
*SB227*

– 24 –
and Human Services pursuant to NRS 656A.100 to engage in the
practice of sign language interpreting in a primary or secondary
educational setting.
(f) Requiring teachers and other educational personnel to be
registered with the Aging and Disability Services Division pursuant
to NRS 656A.100 to engage in the practice of sign language
interpreting in a primary or secondary educational setting if they:
(1) Provide instruction or other educational services; and
(2) Concurrently engage in the practice of sign language
interpreting, as defined in NRS 656A.060.
(g) Prescribing course work on parental involvement and family
engagement. The Commission shall:
(1) Work in cooperation with the Office of Parental
Involvement and Family Engagement created by NRS 385.630 in
developing the regulations required by this paragraph.
(2) Establish standards for professional development training
which may be used to satisfy any course work requirement
prescribed pursuant to this paragraph.
(h) Establishing the requirements for obtaining an endorsement
on the license of a teacher, administrator or other educational
personnel in cultural competency.
(i) Authorizing the Superintendent of Public Instruction to issue
a license by endorsement to an applicant who holds an equivalent
license or authorization issued by a governmental entity in another
country if the Superintendent determines that the qualifications for
the equivalent license or authorization are substantially similar to
those prescribed pursuant to paragraph (a).
(j) Establishing the requirements for obtaining an endorsement
on the license of a teacher, administrator or other educational
personnel in teaching courses relating to financial literacy.
(k) Authorizing a person who is employed as a paraprofessional
and enrolled in a program to become a teacher to complete an
accelerated program of student teaching in the same or a
substantially similar area in which the person is employed as a
paraprofessional while remaining employed as a paraprofessional.
(l) Requiring the Department to accept a program of student
teaching or other teaching experience completed in another state or
foreign country by an applicant for a license if the Department
determines that the program or experience substantially fulfills the
standards of a program of student teaching in this State.
(m) Authorizing a person who is employed by a public school to
provide support or other services relating to school psychology, if
the person does not hold a license or endorsement as a school
psychologist but is enrolled in a program that would allow the
person to obtain such a license or endorsement, to complete a
-
*SB227*

– 25 –
program of internship in school psychology while remaining
employed in such a position.
(n) To carry out the provisions of NRS 391B.010.
(o) To carry out the provisions of section 2 of this act.
2. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 391.027, the
Commission may adopt such other regulations as it deems necessary
for its own government or to carry out its duties.
3. Any regulation which increases the amount of education,
training or experience required for licensing:
(a) Must, in addition to the requirements for publication in
chapter 233B of NRS, be publicized before its adoption in a manner
reasonably calculated to inform those persons affected by the
change.
(b) Must not become effective until at least 1 year after the date
it is adopted by the Commission.
(c) Is not applicable to a license in effect on the date the
regulation becomes effective.
Sec. 4. NRS 391.021 is hereby amended to read as follows:
391.021 1. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 391.027,
the Commission shall adopt regulations governing examinations for
the initial licensing of teachers and other educational personnel. The
regulations adopted by the Commission must ensure that the
examinations test the ability of the applicant to teach and the
applicant’s knowledge of each specific subject he or she proposes to
teach.
2. When adopting regulations pursuant to subsection 1, the
Commission shall consider including any alternative means of
demonstrating competency for persons with a disability or health-
related need that the Commission determines are necessary and
appropriate.
3. The regulations adopted by the Commission pursuant to
subsection 1 must authorize an applicant to be exempt from any
requirement to pass a competency test in basic reading, writing and
mathematics if the applicant submits to the Department evidence
that, after not passing a competency test in basic reading, writing
and mathematics at the level of competence specified by the
Commission, the applicant began and completed, with a grade of B
or better, a course of study approved by the Department in each
subject area of the competency test that the applicant did not pass at
the level of competence specified by the Commission.
4. Teachers and educational personnel from another state who
obtain a reciprocal license pursuant to NRS 391.032 or 391B.010 or
section 2 of this act are not required to take the examinations for the
initial licensing of teachers and other educational personnel
-
*SB227*

– 26 –
described in this section or any other examination for initial
licensing required by the regulations adopted by the Commission.
Sec. 5. NRS 391.032 is hereby amended to read as follows:
391.032 1. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 391.027,
the Commission shall:
(a) Adopt regulations which provide for the issuance of
provisional licenses to teachers and other educational personnel
before completion of all courses of study or other requirements for a
license in this State.
(b) Adopt regulations which provide for the reciprocal licensure
of educational personnel from other states including, without
limitation, for the reciprocal licensure of persons who hold a license
to teach special education. Such regulations must include, without
limitation, provisions:
(1) For the reciprocal licensure of persons who obtained a
license pursuant to an alternative route to licensure which the
Department determines is as rigorous or more rigorous than the
alternative route to licensure prescribed pursuant to subparagraph
(1) of paragraph (a) of subsection 1 of NRS 391.019.
(2) Which provide for the licensure of persons pursuant to
the Interstate Teacher Mobility Compact enacted in NRS 391B.010.
(3) Which provide for the licensure of persons pursuant to
the School Psychologist Interstate Licensure Compact enacted in
section 2 of this act.
2. A person who is a member of the Armed Forces of the
United States, a veteran of the Armed Forces of the United States or
the spouse of such a member or veteran of the Armed Forces of the
United States and who has completed the equivalent of an
alternative route to licensure program in another state may obtain a
license as if such person has completed the alternative route to
licensure program of this State.
3. The Commission shall adopt regulations requiring the
Superintendent of Public Instruction to issue a provisional license to
teach if:
(a) The Superintendent determines that the applicant is
otherwise qualified for the license; and
(b) The applicant:
(1) Graduated with a bachelor’s degree or higher but is
awaiting conferment of the degree; or
(2) Satisfies the requirements for conditional licensure
through an alternative route to licensure.
4. A person who is issued a provisional license must complete
all courses of study and other requirements for a license in this State
which is not provisional within 3 years after the date on which a
provisional license is issued.
-
*SB227*

– 27 –
Sec. 6. NRS 391.0349 is hereby amended to read as follows:
391.0349 1. [Each] Except as otherwise provided in section
2 of this act, each school counselor and school psychologist shall
complete continuing education as determined by the Commission.
2. The Commission shall adopt regulations establishing
continuing education requirements for school counselors and school
psychologists. The regulations must include, without limitation, the
amount of continuing education a school counselor or school
psychologist must complete pursuant to subsection 1.
3. Each school social worker shall complete continuing
education as determined by the Board of Examiners for Social
Workers.
4. The Board of Examiners for Social Workers shall adopt
regulations establishing continuing education requirements for
school social workers. The regulations must include, without
limitation, the amount of continuing education a school social
worker must complete pursuant to subsection 3.
Sec. 7. NRS 391.035 is hereby amended to read as follows:
391.035 1. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 239.0115
and 391.033, and section 2 of this act, an application to the
Superintendent of Public Instruction for a license as a teacher or to
perform other educational functions and all documents in the
Department’s file relating to the application, including:
(a) The applicant’s health records;
(b) The applicant’s fingerprints and any report from the Federal
Bureau of Investigation or the Central Repository for Nevada
Records of Criminal History or information from the Statewide
Central Registry or any equivalent registry maintained by a
governmental agency in another jurisdiction;
(c) Transcripts of the applicant’s records at colleges or other
educational institutions;
(d) The applicant’s scores on the examinations administered
pursuant to the regulations adopted by the Commission;
(e) Any correspondence concerning the application; and
(f) Any other personal information,
 are confidential.
2. It is unlawful to disclose or release the information in an
application or any related document except pursuant to paragraph
(d) of subsection 8 of NRS 179A.075 or the applicant’s written
authorization.
3. The Department shall, upon request, make available the
applicant’s file for inspection by the applicant during regular
business hours.
-
*SB227*

– 28 –
4. The Department may annually require any employee of the
Department who has access to information contained within an
application or any related document to submit to the Department:
(a) A complete set of his or her fingerprints and written
permission authorizing the Department to forward the fingerprints to
the Central Repository for Nevada Records of Criminal History for
its report on the criminal history of the employee and for submission
to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for its report on the criminal
history of the employee; and
(b) Written authorization for the Department to obtain any
information concerning the applicant that may be available from the
Statewide Central Registry and any equivalent registry maintained
by a governmental entity in a jurisdiction in which the applicant has
resided within the immediately preceding 5 years.
5. If the information obtained by the Department pursuant to
subsection 4 indicates that the employee has been convicted of a
felony or any offense involving moral turpitude, the Department
may take such action, as determined by the Department, to deny that
employee access to information contained within an application or
any related document.
Sec. 8. NRS 391.037 is hereby amended to read as follows:
391.037 1. The Commission shall:
(a) Prescribe by regulation the standards for approval of a course
of study or training offered by an educational institution to qualify a
person to be a teacher or administrator or to perform other
educational functions. The regulations prescribed pursuant to this
paragraph must include, without limitation, training on how to
identify a pupil who is at risk for dyslexia or related disorders.
(b) Maintain descriptions of the approved courses of study
required to qualify for endorsements in fields of specialization and
provide to an applicant, upon request, the approved course of study
for a particular endorsement.
2. Except for an applicant who submits an application for the
issuance of a license pursuant to subparagraph (1) of paragraph (a)
of subsection 1 of NRS 391.019 or 391B.010, or section 2 of this
act, an applicant for a license as a teacher or administrator or to
perform some other educational function must submit with his or
her application, in the form prescribed by the Superintendent of
Public Instruction, proof that the applicant has satisfactorily
completed a course of study and training approved by the
Commission pursuant to subsection 1.
Sec. 9. NRS 239.010 is hereby amended to read as follows:
239.010 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section and
NRS 1.4683, 1.4687, 1A.110, 3.2203, 41.0397, 41.071, 49.095,
49.293, 62D.420, 62D.440, 62E.516, 62E.620, 62H.025, 62H.030,
-
*SB227*

– 29 –
62H.170, 62H.220, 62H.320, 75A.100, 75A.150, 76.160, 78.152,
80.113, 81.850, 82.183, 86.246, 86.54615, 87.515, 87.5413,
87A.200, 87A.580, 87A.640, 88.3355, 88.5927, 88.6067, 88A.345,
88A.7345, 89.045, 89.251, 90.730, 91.160, 116.757, 116A.270,
116B.880, 118B.026, 119.260, 119.265, 119.267, 119.280,
119A.280, 119A.653, 119A.677, 119B.370, 119B.382, 120A.640,
120A.690, 125.130, 125B.140, 126.141, 126.161, 126.163, 126.730,
127.007, 127.057, 127.130, 127.140, 127.2817, 128.090, 130.312,
130.712, 136.050, 159.044, 159A.044, 164.041, 172.075, 172.245,
176.01334, 176.01385, 176.015, 176.0625, 176.09129, 176.156,
176A.630, 178.39801, 178.4715, 178.5691, 178.5717, 179.495,
179A.070, 179A.165, 179D.160, 180.600, 200.3771, 200.3772,
200.5095, 200.604, 202.3662, 205.4651, 209.392, 209.3923,
209.3925, 209.419, 209.429, 209.521, 211A.140, 213.010, 213.040,
213.095, 213.131, 217.105, 217.110, 217.464, 217.475, 218A.350,
218E.625, 218F.150, 218G.130, 218G.240, 218G.350, 218G.615,
224.240, 226.462, 226.796, 228.270, 228.450, 228.495, 228.570,
231.069, 231.1285, 231.1473, 232.1369, 233.190, 237.300,
239.0105, 239.0113, 239.014, 239B.026, 239B.030, 239B.040,
239B.050, 239C.140, 239C.210, 239C.230, 239C.250, 239C.270,
239C.420, 240.007, 241.020, 241.030, 241.039, 242.105, 244.264,
244.335, 247.540, 247.545, 247.550, 247.560, 250.087, 250.130,
250.140, 250.145, 250.150, 268.095, 268.0978, 268.490, 268.910,
269.174, 271A.105, 281.195, 281.805, 281A.350, 281A.680,
281A.685, 281A.750, 281A.755, 281A.780, 284.4068, 284.4086,
286.110, 286.118, 287.0438, 289.025, 289.080, 289.387, 289.830,
293.4855, 293.5002, 293.503, 293.504, 293.558, 293.5757, 293.870,
293.906, 293.908, 293.909, 293.910, 293B.135, 293D.510, 331.110,
332.061, 332.351, 333.333, 333.335, 338.070, 338.1379, 338.1593,
338.1725, 338.1727, 348.420, 349.597, 349.775, 353.205,
353A.049, 353A.085, 353A.100, 353C.240, 353D.250, 360.240,
360.247, 360.255, 360.755, 361.044, 361.2242, 361.610, 365.138,
366.160, 368A.180, 370.257, 370.327, 372A.080, 378.290, 378.300,
379.0075, 379.008, 379.1495, 385A.830, 385B.100, 387.626,
387.631, 388.1455, 388.259, 388.501, 388.503, 388.513, 388.750,
388A.247, 388A.249, 391.033, 391.035, 391.0365, 391.120,
391.925, 392.029, 392.147, 392.264, 392.271, 392.315, 392.317,
392.325, 392.327, 392.335, 392.850, 393.045, 394.167, 394.16975,
394.1698, 394.447, 394.460, 394.465, 396.1415, 396.1425, 396.143,
396.159, 396.3295, 396.405, 396.525, 396.535, 396.9685,
398A.115, 408.3885, 408.3886, 408.3888, 408.5484, 412.153,
414.280, 416.070, 422.2749, 422.305, 422A.342, 422A.350,
425.400, 427A.1236, 427A.872, 427A.940, 432.028, 432.205,
432B.175, 432B.280, 432B.290, 432B.4018, 432B.407, 432B.430,
432B.560, 432B.5902, 432C.140, 432C.150, 433.534, 433A.360,
-
*SB227*

– 30 –
439.4941, 439.4988, 439.5282, 439.840, 439.914, 439A.116,
439A.124, 439B.420, 439B.754, 439B.760, 439B.845, 440.170,
441A.195, 441A.220, 441A.230, 442.330, 442.395, 442.735,
442.774, 445A.665, 445B.570, 445B.7773, 449.209, 449.245,
449.4315, 449A.112, 450.140, 450B.188, 450B.805, 453.164,
453.720, 458.055, 458.280, 459.050, 459.3866, 459.555, 459.7056,
459.846, 463.120, 463.15993, 463.240, 463.3403, 463.3407,
463.790, 467.1005, 480.535, 480.545, 480.935, 480.940, 481.063,
481.091, 481.093, 482.170, 482.368, 482.5536, 483.340, 483.363,
483.575, 483.659, 483.800, 484A.469, 484B.830, 484B.833,
484E.070, 485.316, 501.344, 503.452, 522.040, 534A.031, 561.285,
571.160, 584.655, 587.877, 598.0964, 598.098, 598A.110,
598A.420, 599B.090, 603.070, 603A.210, 604A.303, 604A.710,
604D.500, 604D.600, 612.265, 616B.012, 616B.015, 616B.315,
616B.350, 618.341, 618.425, 622.238, 622.310, 623.131, 623A.137,
624.110, 624.265, 624.327, 625.425, 625A.185, 628.418, 628B.230,
628B.760, 629.043, 629.047, 629.069, 630.133, 630.2671,
630.2672, 630.2673, 630.2687, 630.30665, 630.336, 630A.327,
630A.555, 631.332, 631.368, 632.121, 632.125, 632.3415,
632.3423, 632.405, 633.283, 633.301, 633.427, 633.4715, 633.4716,
633.4717, 633.524, 634.055, 634.1303, 634.214, 634A.169,
634A.185, 634B.730, 635.111, 635.158, 636.262, 636.342, 637.085,
637.145, 637B.192, 637B.288, 638.087, 638.089, 639.183,
639.2485, 639.570, 640.075, 640.152, 640A.185, 640A.220,
640B.405, 640B.730, 640C.580, 640C.600, 640C.620, 640C.745,
640C.760, 640D.135, 640D.190, 640E.225, 640E.340, 641.090,
641.221, 641.2215, 641A.191, 641A.217, 641A.262, 641B.170,
641B.281, 641B.282, 641C.455, 641C.760, 641D.260, 641D.320,
642.524, 643.189, 644A.870, 645.180, 645.625, 645A.050,
645A.082, 645B.060, 645B.092, 645C.220, 645C.225, 645D.130,
645D.135, 645G.510, 645H.320, 645H.330, 647.0945, 647.0947,
648.033, 648.197, 649.065, 649.067, 652.126, 652.228, 653.900,
654.110, 656.105, 657A.510, 661.115, 665.130, 665.133, 669.275,
669.285, 669A.310, 670B.680, 671.365, 671.415, 673.450, 673.480,
675.380, 676A.340, 676A.370, 677.243, 678A.470, 678C.710,
678C.800, 679B.122, 679B.124, 679B.152, 679B.159, 679B.190,
679B.285, 679B.690, 680A.270, 681A.440, 681B.260, 681B.410,
681B.540, 683A.0873, 685A.077, 686A.289, 686B.170, 686C.306,
687A.060, 687A.115, 687B.404, 687C.010, 688C.230, 688C.480,
688C.490, 689A.696, 692A.117, 692C.190, 692C.3507, 692C.3536,
692C.3538, 692C.354, 692C.420, 693A.480, 693A.615, 696B.550,
696C.120, 703.196, 704B.325, 706.1725, 706A.230, 710.159,
711.600, and section 2 of this act, sections 35, 38 and 41 of chapter
478, Statutes of Nevada 2011 and section 2 of chapter 391, Statutes
of Nevada 2013 and unless otherwise declared by law to be
-
*SB227*

– 31 –
confidential, all public books and public records of a governmental
entity must be open at all times during office hours to inspection by
any person, and may be fully copied or an abstract or memorandum
may be prepared from those public books and public records. Any
such copies, abstracts or memoranda may be used to supply the
general public with copies, abstracts or memoranda of the records or
may be used in any other way to the advantage of the governmental
entity or of the general public. This section does not supersede or in
any manner affect the federal laws governing copyrights or enlarge,
diminish or affect in any other manner the rights of a person in any
written book or record which is copyrighted pursuant to federal law.
2. A governmental entity may not reject a book or record
which is copyrighted solely because it is copyrighted.
3. A governmental entity that has legal custody or control of a
public book or record shall not deny a request made pursuant to
subsection 1 to inspect or copy or receive a copy of a public book or
record on the basis that the requested public book or record contains
information that is confidential if the governmental entity can
redact, delete, conceal or separate, including, without limitation,
electronically, the confidential information from the information
included in the public book or record that is not otherwise
confidential.
4. If requested, a governmental entity shall provide a copy of a
public record in an electronic format by means of an electronic
medium. Nothing in this subsection requires a governmental entity
to provide a copy of a public record in an electronic format or by
means of an electronic medium if:
(a) The public record:
(1) Was not created or prepared in an electronic format; and
(2) Is not available in an electronic format; or
(b) Providing the public record in an electronic format or by
means of an electronic medium would:
(1) Give access to proprietary software; or
(2) Require the production of information that is confidential
and that cannot be redacted, deleted, concealed or separated from
information that is not otherwise confidential.
5. An officer, employee or agent of a governmental entity who
has legal custody or control of a public record:
(a) Shall not refuse to provide a copy of that public record in the
medium that is requested because the officer, employee or agent has
already prepared or would prefer to provide the copy in a different
medium.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in NRS 239.030, shall, upon
request, prepare the copy of the public record and shall not require
-
*SB227*

– 32 –
the person who has requested the copy to prepare the copy himself
or herself.
Sec. 10. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
H
-
*SB227*